Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5851YC (2) 91 sc/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 26.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (5) Construction , equipment, or repair or maintenance work 3 acquired by or performed for a city utility under chapter 388 4 when such construction or work is performed by its employees or 5 when such work relates to , or such construction, equipment, or 6 work relates to an electric generation or transmission project, 7 existing utility infrastructure , or establishing connections 8 to existing utility infrastructure. For purposes of this 9 subparagraph, âutility infrastructureâ includes facilities used 10 for the storage, collection, disposal, treatment, generation, 11 transmission, or distribution of water, sewage, waste, 12 electricity, gas, or telecommunications service. 13